Washington statutes.
RCW 35.30.080

Alternative election procedures—Resolution required.

(1) When a majority of the legislative body of an unclassified city determines that it would serve the best interests and general welfare of such municipality to change the election procedures of such city to the procedures specified in this section, such legislative body may, by resolution, declare its intention to adopt such procedures for the city. Such resolution must be adopted at least one hundred eighty days before the general municipal election at which the new election procedures are implemented. Within ten days after the passage of the resolution, the legislative body shall cause it to be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation within the city.

(2) All general municipal elections in an unclassified city adopting a resolution under subsection (1) of this section shall be held biennially in the odd-numbered years as provided in RCW 29A.04.330 and shall be held in accordance with the general election laws of the state.

The term of the treasurer shall not commence in the same biennium in which the term of the mayor commences. Candidates for the city council shall run for specific council positions. The staggering of terms of city officers shall be established at the first election, where the simple majority of the persons elected as councilmembers receiving the greatest numbers of votes shall be elected to four-year terms of office and the remainder of the persons elected as councilmembers and the treasurer shall be elected to two-year terms of office. Thereafter, all elected city officers shall be elected for four-year terms and until their successors are elected and qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW 29A.60.280.

[ 2015 c 53 s 42; 2003 c 42 s 2.]